Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.008

[Art. 2] Persons subject to this code.

This code applies to all members of the organized militia who are not in federal service pursuant to Title 10 U.S.C.

[ 2009 c 378 s 4; 1989 c 48 s 2; 1963 c 220 s 2.]